Illinois, session 104th, HB4563.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 12-10 and by adding Section 12-12 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/12-10)7    Sec. 12-10. Publication of assessments; counties of less 8than 3,000,000. 9    (a) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 10except as provided in Section 12-12, as soon as the chief 11county assessment officer has completed the assessment in the 12county or in the assessment district, he or she shall, in each 13year of a general assessment, publish for the county or 14assessment district a complete list of the assessment, by 15townships if so organized. 16    (b) Except as provided in Section 12-12, in In years other 17than years of a general assessment, the chief county 18assessment officer shall publish a list of property for which 19assessments have been added or changed since the preceding 20assessment, together with the amounts of the assessments, 21except that publication of individual assessment changes shall 22not be required if the changes result from equalization by the 23supervisor of assessments under Section 9-210, or Section   HB4563- 2 -LRB104 16378 HLH 29766 b110-200, in which case the list shall include a general 2statement indicating that assessments have been changed 3because of the application of an equalization factor and shall 4set forth the percentage of increase or decrease represented 5by the factor. 6    (c) The publication shall be made on or before December 31 7of that year, and shall be printed in some public newspaper or 8newspapers published in the county; if no newspaper is 9published in the county, then the publication shall be printed 10in some public newspaper of general circulation in the county. 11In every township or assessment district in which there is 12published one or more newspapers of general circulation, the 13list of that township shall be published in one of the 14newspapers.15    (d) At the top of the list of assessments, or in place of 16the list of assessments if the list is published on a county 17website as provided by Section 12-12, there shall be a notice 18in substantially the following form printed in type no smaller 19than eleven point:20"NOTICE TO TAXPAYERS21    Median Level of Assessment--(insert here the median level 22of assessment for the assessment district)23    Your property is to be assessed at the above listed median 24level of assessment for the assessment district. You may check 25the accuracy of your assessment by dividing your assessment by 26the median level of assessment. The resulting value should   HB4563- 3 -LRB104 16378 HLH 29766 b1equal the estimated fair cash value of your property. If the 2resulting value is greater than the estimated fair cash value 3of your property, you may be over-assessed. If the resulting 4value is less than the fair cash value of your property, you 5may be under-assessed. You may appeal your assessment to the 6Board of Review."7    If the list of assessments has been published on a county 8website under the provisions of Section 12-12, then the notice 9must state: "A complete list of the assessments for this 10county or assessment district is available at (insert URL of 11county website)." 12    (e) The notice published under this Section shall also 13include the following: 14        (1) A statement advising the taxpayer that assessments 15    of property, other than farm land and coal, are required 16    by law to be assessed at 33 1/3% of fair market value. 17        (2) The name, address, phone number, office hours, 18    and, if one exists, the website address of the assessor. 19        (3) A statement advising the taxpayer of the steps to 20    follow if the taxpayer believes the full fair market value 21    of the property is incorrect or believes the assessment is 22    not uniform with other comparable properties in the same 23    neighborhood. The statement shall also (i) advise all 24    taxpayers to contact the township assessor's office, in 25    those counties under township organization, first to 26    review the assessment, (ii) advise all taxpayers to file   HB4563- 4 -LRB104 16378 HLH 29766 b1    an appeal with the board of review if not satisfied with 2    the assessor review, and (iii) give the phone number to 3    call for a copy of the board of review rules; if the Board 4    of Review maintains a web site, the notice must also 5    include the address of the website where the Board of 6    Review rules can be viewed. 7        (4) A statement advising the taxpayer that there is a 8    deadline date for filing an appeal with the board of 9    review and indicating that deadline date (30 days 10    following the scheduled publication date). 11        (5) A brief explanation of the relationship between 12    the assessment and the tax bill. 13        (6) In bold type, a notice of possible eligibility for 14    the various homestead exemptions as provided in Section 15    15-165 through Section 15-175 and Section 15-180. 16    The newspaper shall furnish to the local assessment 17officers as many copies of the paper containing the assessment 18list as they may require.19(Source: P.A. 97-146, eff. 7-14-11.) 20    (35 ILCS 200/12-12 new)21    Sec. 12-12. Publication of assessments on county website; 22counties of less than 3,000,000. 23    (a) As used in this Section:24    "County website" means a website that is managed by either 25the county board or the chief county assessment officer and   HB4563- 5 -LRB104 16378 HLH 29766 b1that has been available to the public with the same URL for at 2least one year.3    "List of assessments" means a complete list of the 4assessment, by township if so organized, containing the 5information listed in Section 12-25.6    (b) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, as 7soon as the chief county assessment officer has completed the 8assessment in the county or in the assessment district in any 9year, the chief county assessment officer may, in place of 10publishing the list of assessments as described in Section 1112-10, publish the list of assessments on the county website. 12The list of assessments must be in searchable text and not an 13unsearchable image. The list of assessments must include the 14language provided in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 12-10. 15The list of assessments must be maintained on the website at 16least until the board of review certifies the county 17assessment roll to the clerk as described in Section 16-85.18    (c) Upon the request of any taxpayer, the chief county 19assessment officer shall provide to that taxpayer a printed 20copy of the list of assessments at no charge. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.